Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 2
STATE OFFICE ON AGING

26-11-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advisory council" means a representative body of laypersons and service providers which represents the interests of the older persons within the boundaries of a planning and service area and which is designated by the area agency on aging pursuant to section 26-11-205.

"Area agency on aging" means an identifiable private nonprofit or public agency designated by the state office on aging which works for the interests of older Coloradans within a planning and service area and which engages in community planning, coordination, and program development and provides a broad array of social and nutritional services.

"Area plan" means a comprehensive and coordinated system of programs in a planning and service area.

(3.5) "Child" means a person who is not more than eighteen years of age.

"Comprehensive and coordinated system of programs" means programs of interrelated social and nutritional services designed to meet the needs of older persons.

(4.5) "Family caregiver" means an adult family member, or another individual, who is an informal provider of in-home and community care to an older individual who is sixty years of age or older.

(4.7) "Grandparent or older individual who is a relative caregiver" means a grandparent or step-grandparent of a child, or a relative of a child by blood or marriage, who is sixty years of age or older and who:

Lives with the child;

Is the primary caregiver of the child because the biological or adoptive parents are unable or unwilling to serve as the primary caregiver of the child; and

Has a legal relationship to the child, such as legal custody or guardianship, or is raising the child informally.

"Greatest economic need" means the need resulting from an income level at or below the poverty threshold established by the United States bureau of the census.

"Greatest social need" means the need caused by noneconomic factors, as associated with the federally protected class statuses recognized by section 504 of the federal "Rehabilitation Act of 1973", 29 U.S.C. sec. 794, as amended; the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended; and Title VII of the federal "Civil Rights Act of 1964", 42 U.S.C. sec. 2000e et seq., as amended, that restrict an individual's ability to perform normal daily tasks or that threaten an individual's capacity to live independently.

"Planning and service area" means a geographical area within the state, designated by the state office on aging, in which the area agency on aging shall carry out the area plan.

"State office" means the state office on aging within the state department.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 975, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2002:

(3.5), (4.5), and (4.7) added, p. 802, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2022:

(6) amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 202, § 6, effective March 24.

26-11-202. State office on aging.

The executive director shall create in the state department a state office on aging, the head of which is the director of the state office, who is appointed by the executive director. The state office and the director of the state office are

type 2

entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their powers and perform their duties and functions under the state department.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 976, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3378, § 72, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-11-203. Duties of the state office.

In addition to such other duties and functions as the executive director may allocate to the state office, the state office shall have the following duties and functions:

To be the leader concerning aging issues on behalf of all older Coloradans while acting in coordination with other state departments and agencies, as appropriate;

To carry out a wide range of functions related to advocacy, planning, coordination, interagency collaboration, information sharing, and monitoring and evaluating to develop and enhance a comprehensive and coordinated state- and community-based system to assist older Coloradans to lead independent, meaningful, and dignified lives in the residential settings of their own choice;

To develop and administer a state plan on aging, which includes input from area agencies on aging developed in accordance with federal guidelines, with additional content to the plan to be determined collaboratively between the state office, the commission, and the technical advisory committee convened in the state office pursuant to subsection (1)(k) of this section. The additional content to the plan reflects the comprehensive impacts and planning associated with Colorado's demographics.

To establish a process that encourages local, regional, and statewide participation in the development stages of the state plan on aging, which shall be coordinated with the area agencies on aging, the commission established pursuant to part 1 of this article 11, and other persons or entities involved in programs for older persons;

To assist public and nonprofit private agencies and the for-profit sector in planning and developing programs to facilitate a statewide network of comprehensive, coordinated services and opportunities for older Coloradans, giving priority to those agencies, programs, services, and activities that support independent living, prepare Coloradans for their later years, and empower older Coloradans to be self-reliant and independent, which includes fostering public-private partnerships when appropriate;

To study those aspects of the problems of aging necessary to accomplish the purpose of state policy through such activities as conducting research, computing statistics, evaluating emerging technologies and innovations, holding hearings, and drafting policy recommendations;

To maintain a clearinghouse of information related to the interests and needs of older Coloradans and act as a referral service for the dissemination of the information;

To assess the need for services to be provided to the older population within the state and determine the extent to which the state's service delivery system serves that population, with particular emphasis on older Coloradans with the greatest economic and social needs, as well as empowering older Coloradans to plan for the needs of increased life expectancy;

To encourage and support the involvement of volunteers and seek ways to utilize the private sector to capitalize on the opportunities to support older Coloradans and their families;

To designate area agencies on aging to assist the state office in carrying out its functions in specified geographic areas within the state;

To convene and coordinate a technical advisory committee comprised of key state department representatives, including but not limited to the department of human services, department of labor and employment, department of higher education, department of health care policy and financing, department of transportation, department of public health and environment, and department of local affairs, to direct the implementation of recommendations and strategies provided in the strategic action plan on aging developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as that section existed prior to June 30, 2022, and recommendations the commission makes as set forth in section 26-11-105; and

To coordinate with the technical advisory committee and commission to develop, maintain, and make publicly available on the state department's website a collection of available data sets; metrics specific to the implementation of strategies in alignment with the strategic action plan on aging developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as that section existed prior to June 30, 2022, and the lifelong Colorado initiative created pursuant to section 26-11-302; and other recommendations that the commission makes as set forth in section 26-11-105.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 976, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 202, § 7, effective March 24; (1)(k) and (1)(l) amended, (HB 22-1209), ch. 95, p. 455, § 6, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

Section 8(2) of chapter 95 (HB 22-1209), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1035 (chapter 38) becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1035 or HB 22-1209, whichever is later. HB 22-1035 became law and took effect March 24, 2022, and HB 22-1209 took effect April 12, 2022.

26-11-204. Area agency on aging - duties.

An area agency on aging shall have the following duties:

To develop and administer an area plan, consistent with the state plan, for a comprehensive and coordinated system of programs in the planning and service area;

To assist older persons in obtaining their rights, benefits, and entitlements currently available under the law;

To identify special needs or barriers to maintaining personal independence;

To involve older persons in the area in the development and planning of services delivered within the area;

To assess the needs for services within the planning and service area to determine the effectiveness of existing services available within the area;

To conduct public hearings on the needs and problems of older persons and on the area plan in conjunction with the area's advisory council;

To designate an interagency committee composed of public or private nonprofit agencies within the planning and service area, including, but not limited to, health systems agencies and health transportation agencies, private service providers, and senior citizen organizations in order to improve the coordination of services;

To review and provide comment on program plans of other agencies that affect older persons;

To provide information to the state office on the special needs of older persons within the planning and service area;

To establish communication with the local news media to inform the public of available services and opportunities to contribute to the planning and implementation of said services;

To coordinate and assist local public and nonprofit private agencies in the planning and development of programs to establish a comprehensive and coordinated system of programs and opportunities for older persons;

To act as an advocate for and represent the issues and concerns of older persons; and

To provide services or to contract with local providers to provide services under the family caregiver support program.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 977, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2002:

(1)(k) amended and (1)(m) added, p. 803, § 2, effective May 30.

26-11-205. Area agency on aging advisory council.

Each area agency on aging, designated pursuant to section 26-11-203, shall designate an advisory council consisting of a representative body of laypersons and service providers who represent the interests of older persons within the planning and service area. The advisory council shall:

Serve to advise the area agency on aging;

Actively seek advice from community organizations on aging, senior advocacy organizations, and other persons or entities interested in the needs and problems of older persons;

Act as an advocate for and represent the issues and concerns of older persons; and

Take an active role in the development, planning, and implementation of the area plan.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part added, p. 978, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 206, § 9, effective March 24.

26-11-205.5. Older Coloradans program - distribution formula - cash fund.

There is hereby created in the state department the older Coloradans program, referred to in this section as the "program". The program shall provide moneys to area agencies on aging to provide grants to provide community-based services to persons sixty years of age or older to assist such persons to live in their own homes and communities for as long as possible. Such services shall include but are not limited to congregate nutrition, home-delivered meals, transportation services, in-home services, ombudsman services, legal services, elder abuse prevention, outreach, and information and referral services.

After retaining an amount for the state department's indirect costs, as calculated under the federally approved cost allocation plan, money appropriated for the program shall be distributed to area agencies on aging using the same formula that the state office uses to distribute money available under Title III, parts (B), (C), (D), and (F) of the federal "Older Americans Act of 1965", as amended, but such money shall be allocated as a whole and not allocated to individual parts of Title III; except that appropriations from the fund of accumulated interest are not subject to the restriction that requires allocations as a whole. An area agency on aging shall use no more than ten percent of the money received from the program for administrative expenses.

The proposed uses of moneys from the program shall be included in each area agency on aging's area plan developed pursuant to section 26-11-204 (1)(a).

On or before August 1, 2002, and each August 1 thereafter, each area agency on aging shall submit a report to the state office detailing the use of moneys from the program for the previous fiscal year, including an itemization of how many more persons received each service because of such moneys.

Repealed.

There is hereby created the older Coloradans cash fund, referred to in this subsection (5) as the "fund". The fund consists of moneys allocated and credited to the fund from sales and use taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 39-26-123 (3), C.R.S., and any moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly. In addition, the state treasurer may credit to the fund any public or private gifts, grants, or donations received by the state department for implementation of the program. The fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-36-114, C.R.S., all interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund is credited to the fund. Any amount remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and not be transferred or credited to the general fund or any other fund.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (5) to the contrary, on July 1, 2020, the state treasurer shall deduct thirteen million dollars from the fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 900, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2001:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 1462, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2002:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 148, § 1, effective March 27; (1) and (3) to (5) amended, p. 901, §§ 1, 2, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

(4)(b) amended, p. 2011, § 101, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(4)(b) repealed, p. 472, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(5) amended, p. 938, § 1, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1603, § 5, effective July 2.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 989, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(5) amended, (HB 12-1326), ch. 195, p. 777, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 2013:

(5)(a) amended, (SB 13-127), ch. 349, p. 2027, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-207), ch. 204, p. 1319, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2020:

(5)(b) amended and (5)(c) added, (HB 20-1387), ch. 174, p. 801, § 2, effective June 29.

26-11-205.7. Community long-term care study - older Coloradans study cash fund - strategic plan - authority to implement.

Subject to the receipt of sufficient moneys pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the state department or, if appropriate, the department of health care policy and financing shall contract for a study of the population eligible for services under the older Coloradans program created pursuant to section 26-11-205.5. The state department and the department of health care policy and financing shall make necessary data available to the contractor. In selecting a contractor to perform the study, the state departments are not required to follow the competitive bidding requirements of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S. The study shall include research and analysis of:

The demographic changes that will impact the demand for long-term care services and supports;

The number of persons sixty years of age or older who would benefit from receiving additional services through the older Coloradans program thereby avoiding more expensive care needs;

The types of services and supports needed by persons over sixty years of age to remain in their own residences and communities for as long as possible and any existing or projected needs for those services and supports;

The overall amount of savings to the state across the continuum of care associated with providing services to older adults in their own homes and communities;

Other states' experiences with long-term care services and supports, including cost savings or cost avoidance; and

Recommendations for a long-term strategic implementation plan for providing services through the older Coloradans program.

The state department is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private and public sources for the purposes of this section; except that the state department may not accept a gift, grant, or donation that is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this section or any other law of the state. The state department shall transmit all private and public moneys received through gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the older Coloradans study cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund". The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department for the direct and indirect costs associated with implementing this section.

Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

If the study conducted pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section concludes that increasing funding for community-based services as provided in the older Coloradans program would result in cost savings, by July 1, 2011, subject to the receipt of sufficient money pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the state department shall report to the members of the health and human services committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, and to the members of the joint budget committee a long-term strategic implementation plan, developed in cooperation with the area agencies on aging designated pursuant to section 26-11-203, that identifies the expected needs for services and recommends potential funding sources.

If the study conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section concludes that one or more changes would result in cost savings to the state, without adversely affecting the care provided, and the changes are recommended in the strategic implementation plan developed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the state department or the department of health care policy and financing shall request, through the state budget process, that the changes be implemented and, if necessary, shall recommend legislation to implement the changes to the health and human services committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, or the joint budget committee.

If the strategic implementation plan developed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section identifies additional studies that should be conducted, subject to the receipt of sufficient moneys pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, the state department or the department of health care policy and financing shall contract for one or more studies identified in the strategic implementation plan. The state department and the department of health care policy and financing shall make necessary data available to all the contractors. In selecting a contractor to perform any study conducted pursuant to this subsection (4), the state departments are not required to follow the competitive bidding requirements of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.

If one or more studies conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) concludes that implementing the changes recommended by the study would result in cost savings to the state, without adversely affecting the care provided, the state department or the department of health care policy and financing shall request, through the state budget process, that the changes be implemented and, if necessary, shall recommend legislation to implement the changes to the health and human services committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, or to the joint budget committee of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1053), ch. 276, p. 1265, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1170, § 74, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1035), ch. 38, p. 206, § 10, effective March 24.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 276, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

26-11-206. Federal requirements - compliance.

Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed to prevent the state department from complying with the requirements of the rules and regulations of the United States department of health and human services promulgated pursuant to the federal "Older Americans Act of 1965", as amended.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire part 2 added, p. 978, § 3, effective May 29.

26-11-207. Family caregiver support program - creation.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that it would be beneficial to the state to develop a service delivery system to respond to the needs of caregivers who care for frail, elderly persons or to the needs of grandparents and relative caregivers who have taken on the challenge and responsibility of raising children. The general assembly also finds that the federal "Older Americans Act of 2000", Pub.L. 106-501, has authorized a family caregiver support program to be administered by area agencies on aging. The general assembly finds that by implementing the family caregiver support program support can be given to caregivers so that elderly individuals may be able to remain in their homes and support may be provided to grandparents or older individuals who are relative caregivers of children.

There is hereby created in the state department the family caregiver support program, referred to in this section as the "program". The program shall allocate available moneys to area agencies on aging to provide support services to the following caregivers:

Family caregivers of older individuals; and

Grandparents or older individuals who are relative caregivers of children.

Subject to available appropriations, services to caregivers shall be provided by an area agency on aging or by an entity with which the area agency on aging has contracted. The services to caregivers under the program shall include:

Information to caregivers about available services;

Assistance to caregivers in gaining access to the services;

Individual counseling, organization of support groups, and caregiver training to assist the caregivers in making decisions and solving problems relating to their caregiving responsibilities;

Respite care to enable caregivers to be temporarily relieved from their caregiving responsibilities; and

Supplemental services, on a limited basis, to complement the care provided by caregivers.

In the case of a family caregiver of an older individual, respite care, as described in paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of this section, and supplemental services, as described in paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of this section, shall be provided only if the older individual meets the conditions specified in the federal law under the definition of the term "frail" which states that the older individual is functionally impaired because the individual either:

Is unable to perform at least two activities of daily living without substantial human assistance, including verbal reminding, physical cuing, or supervision; or

Due to a cognitive or other mental impairment, requires substantial supervision because the individual behaves in a manner that poses a serious health or safety hazard to the individual or to another individual.

The area agency on aging shall give priority for services under the program to older individuals with greatest social and economic need, with particular attention to low-income older individuals, and to older individuals providing care and support to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Each area agency on aging shall coordinate the activities of the agency or any contractors with whom the agency has contracted with the activities of other community agencies and volunteer organizations providing the types of support services described in subsection (3) of this section.

The state shall not use more than ten percent of the total federal and state share of the moneys available to the state for the program to provide support services to grandparents and older individuals who are relative caregivers of children.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 803, § 3, effective May 30.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (SB 18-096), ch. 44, p. 475, § 18, effective August 8.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Older Americans Act of 1965", see 42 U.S.C. sec. 3001.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 18-096, see section 1 of chapter 44, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-11-208. Strategic investments in aging grant program - fund created - report - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible organization" means an area agency on aging, as defined in section 26-11-201, and other entities the state department determines appropriate to advance strategies and investments aligned with the strategic action plan on aging, developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as the section existed prior to July 1, 2022, and the state plan on aging described pursuant to section 26-11-203 (1).

"Fund" means the strategic investments in aging cash fund created in subsection (5) of this section.

"Grant program" or "program" means the strategic investments in aging grant program created in subsection (2) of this section.

The strategic investments in aging grant program is established in the state office. The state office shall establish and administer the grant program. The purpose of the grant program is to provide state assistance received in the form of grant awards to finance various projects across the state that are intended to assist and support older Coloradans. The grant program is intended to support projects that promote the health, equity, well-being, and security of older Coloradans across the state that are consistent with the recommendations of the strategic action plan on aging, developed pursuant to section 24-32-3406, as that section existed prior to July 1, 2022, and the state plan on aging described pursuant to section 26-11-203 (1), including:

Community services for older Coloradans;

Infrastructure improvements;

Health promotion, congregate meals, and socialization activities;

Transportation services;

Home modification programs;

Implementation of evidence-based fall prevention and chronic disease management programs;

Community assessments, data collection, and research; and

Pilot programs and demonstration projects.

The state office shall:

Adopt policies and procedures for the administration of the program;

Create application procedures by which eligible organizations may apply for and receive grant money from the grant program;

Establish criteria for the selection of applications; and

Coordinate with the Colorado energy office, created in section 24-38.5-101, on incentives and potential investments that align with the greenhouse goals described in section 25-7-102 to increase energy efficiency and renewable electricity in buildings used by older Coloradans and the use of electric vehicles for transporting older Coloradans.

Beginning in January 2023, and every January thereafter, the state department shall include in its report to the committees of reference pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203 information from the state office regarding the grant program, as set forth in this subsection (3), including information on the type of projects financed by grant awards, the amount of money awarded to each project, and where those projects were conducted and the program's impact on the health, equity, well-being, and security of older Coloradans.

The state office may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section.

There is created in the state treasury the strategic investments in aging cash fund. The fund consists of money appropriated to the fund by the general assembly.

For fiscal year 2021-22, the general assembly shall appropriate fifteen million dollars from the general fund to the fund.

Any unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year remains in the fund and is not transferred to the general fund or any other fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-36-114, all interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund is credited to the fund.

Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the state department to fund programs and projects consistent with this section. The state department may expend money from the fund for the purpose of implementing this section, including any direct and indirect costs.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-290), ch. 426, p. 2823, § 2, effective July 6.

L. 2022:

(1), IP(2), (2)(e), (3), (5)(a), (5)(c), and (5)(d) amended, (2)(g) and (2)(h) added, and (6) repealed, (SB 22-185), ch. 487, p. 3531, § 1, effective June 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-290, see section 1 of chapter 426, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.